Colorado statutes. TITLE 2 Legislative
PART 3
AMENDATORY STATUTES

2-4-301. Multiple amendments to the same provision - one without reference to the other.

If amendments to the same statute are enacted at the same or different sessions of the general assembly and one amendment is without reference to another, the amendments are to be harmonized, if possible, so that effect may be given to each. If the amendments are irreconcilable, the amendment prevails which is latest in its effective date. If the irreconcilable statutes have the same effective date, the statute prevails which is latest in its date of passage.

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 1425, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 135-1-301.

2-4-302. Repeal of a repealing statute.

The repeal of a repealing statute does not revive the statute originally repealed.

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 1425, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 135-1-302.

2-4-303. Penalties and liabilities not released by repeal.

The repeal, revision, amendment, or consolidation of any statute or part of a statute or section or part of a section of any statute shall not have the effect to release, extinguish, alter, modify, or change in whole or in part any penalty, forfeiture, or liability, either civil or criminal, which shall have been incurred under such statute, unless the repealing, revising, amending, or consolidating act so expressly provides, and such statute or part of a statute or section or part of a section of a statute so repealed, amended, or revised shall be treated and held as still remaining in force for the purpose of sustaining any and all proper actions, suits, proceedings, and prosecutions, criminal as well as civil, for the enforcement of such penalty, forfeiture, or liability, as well as for the purpose of sustaining any judgment, decree, or order which can or may be rendered, entered, or made in such actions, suits, proceedings, or prosecutions imposing, inflicting, or declaring such penalty, forfeiture, or liability.

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 1425, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 135-1-303.